tex/context/patterns/lang-de.pat
\patterns{
.ab1a
.abi4
.ab3l
.abo2
.ab3ol
.ab1or
.ack2
.ag4n
.ag4r
.ag2u
.ai2s
.akt2a
.al2e
.al5l4en
.al4tei
.alt3s
.ampe4
.amt2s
.amt4sc
.an3d2
.anden6k
.and4ri
.ang2
.an3gli
.angs4
.angst3
.an3s
.an4si.
.ans2p
.ans2t
.an4tag
.an3th
.an3z2
.apo1
.aps2
.ari1e
.ark2a
.ar4m3ac
.ar2sc
.ar4t3ei
.ar6t5erh
.as3t
.as4ta
.at4h
.au3d
.au4f3
.au4s3
.ausch3
.ax4
.äm3
.är6schl
.ät2s
.be3erb
.be3r2a
.be3r2e
.berg3a
.ber6gab
.ber6g5e6b
.ber4gl
.ber4g3r
.boge2
.bo4s3k
.bu4ser
.by4t
.ch2
.dab4
.da2r1
.da4rin
.dar2m1
.da4te.
.da4tes
.de2al
.de1i
.de4in.
.de1o2
.de3r4en
.de1s
.des2e
.de3sk
.des2t
.dien4e
.do2mo
.do1pe
.dorf1
.dü1b
.dys1
.ebe2r1
.ehe1i
.ei3e2
.ei4na
.einen6g
.ei2sp
.ei4st
.ei4tr
.eke2
.el2bi
.elb3s
.em3m2
.en1
.en4d3er
.en5der.
.en2d3r
.end3s
.en2gl
.enn2
.enns3
.en2t3
.en4tei
.en4tr
.er8brecht
.erb3s
.er2bu
.er2da
.er4dan
.er4dar
.er4dei
.er4der
.er1e
.ere3c
.erf4
.er1i
.er8stein
.erster6
.er8stritt.
.er8stritten.
.er4zen4
.esel4s
.es1p
.es3ta
.es5t4e
.est2h
.es3to
.es5tr
.et2s
.eu1
.eu3g4
.eu3t
.eve4r
.ext4
.fe4i
.fer4no
.fi3est
.fi4le.
.fi4len
.fi2s
.flug1
.for2t
.fs4
.fu2sc
.ga4t
.gd2
.geb2l
.gel2d1
.ge5nar
.ge3n2e
.gene7cke
.ge3r2a
.ge3r2e
.ge3u
.gs4
.guss1
.hau2t1
.he2
.her3an
.he3ri
.he6r5inn
.hi2s
.ho4met
.ia4
.im2a
.ima4ge
.im5m
.in1
.in3e
.ink4
.inn2e
.inu1
.ire3
.is2a
.ka2b5l
.ka2i
.kamp2
.ka4t3io
.ki4e
.kle4i
.kopf1
.ks2
.kus2
.le4ar
.lich8t7er8s
.li2f
.li4tu
.li4ve.
.lo4g3in
.lo3ver
.lus4tr
.ma3d
.ma3la
.mal4e
.ma2st
.md2
.mel2a
.me3no
.men8schl
.men8schw
.men3t4
.mi4t1
.mm2
.näs1c
.ne4s
.ni4e
.nob4
.no4th
.nus2
.oa3
.ob1a
.obe2
.oper4
.or2a
.ort2
.orts3e
.os5t6alg
.oste2
.ost5end
.os8ten8de
.oste6re
.ost3r
.ozo4
.öd2
.pa4r1e
.par3t4h
.pe4c
.pes4te
.pf4
.ph2
.poka2
.pro1
.ps2
.rabe4
.ra3me
.ram3s
.reb3s2
.re3cha
.rein4t
.reli1
.reli3e
.res6tr
.ri2as
.rich5te
.ro4a
.ro3m2a
.rö2s1
.rü1b
.rü6cker6
.sali3e
.sch4
.se3ck
.sen3s
.ser2u
.se2t1
.sha2
.si4te
.ski1e
.spiege8lei
.st6
.sto4re
.sucher6
.tage4s
.tan4k3l
.ta2to
.te2e
.te2f
.te3no
.te2s
.te4st
.th4
.ti2a
.tid1
.ti4me.
.ti4mes
.ti2s
.ti5ta
.to4nin
.to4pl
.to2w
.tri3es
.tro2s
.ts2
.tu3ri
.uf2e2
.ufer1
.ul4mei
.um3
.umo2
.un3a2
.un3d
.un3g
.uni4t
.un3s
.uns4t
.ur1
.ur2i
.urin4s
.ur3o2m
.uro2p
.ur3s2
.ut2a
.ut3r
.übe4
.ve5n2e
.vo4r
.wah4l
.wa2s
.wei4ta
.wi4e
.wor2
.wort5en6
.wor8tend
.wor4tu
.xe3
.ya4l
.za2s
.zi2e
.zin4st
.zwe2
a1ab
aa2be
aa1c
aa2gr
2a1a2n
2a2ar
aa2r1a
aar3f4
aar3k
aar5sc
aas5t
aata2
aa2th
aa2t3r
aat4s3
2a3au
a1ä
a1b
2aba
ab4am
ab1auf
ab1ä
ab2äu
1abd
ab1eb
abe1e
abei1
ab1eil
2abel
abe2la2
a3ber
ab1er2k
ab1er2r
ab1er2z
ab3esse
2abet
2abew
1abf
3abfi
1abg
1abh
2abi
a3bil
ab1ins
ab1ir
ab1it
1abk
ab1l
1a2bla
1a2blä
2able
ab4le.
ab3li
ab4lo
3a2blö
a2blu
1abn
a2bo.
ab2of
1a2bon
2a3bor
ab3r
a3bra
a4brä
2abrü
1abs
2abs.
abs2a
2absar
ab3s2i
ab3s2p
abst2
2abst.
ab3ste
ab3sz
1abtei
2abu
ab1ur
2abü
1abw
2aby
aby4t
1abz
2aca
2ac1c
a1cem
2ach.
ach1a
a1chal
ach3au
2achb
2a1che
a2ch1e2c
ach1ei
a4cherf
a4cherk
a4cherö
a4ch3erw
a1chi
ach3l
ach3m
ach3n
a1cho
a3cho.
ach1o2b
ach1or
ach3ö
ach3r
ach3s2i
ach3su
a4cht
acht7ersc
ach2t1o
ach8traum
ach8träume.
ach8träumen.
ach6trit
a1chu
ach1u2f
ach3ü
2achv
4ach1w
a1ci
ac1in
2ack.
a1ckar
a2ckin
ack2se
ack3sl
ack3sta4
a1cl
acon4n
2acu
a1ç
a1d
2ada.
a3d2ab
ad2ag
ada2m
ad3ama
a2d1an
3a4dap
a3d2ar3
4adav
1a2dä
ad1c
1add
2ade.
ade2al
adefi4
a2dein
2aden
ade1r2a
a2deri
4ade1s
ade3s2p
ades4s
ade5str
2adf
2adh
4a3di
adi3en
5adj
2ado
ad2ob
2adp
2adq
2ad3rec
ad4res
2ads2
ad3st
ad3sz
ad2t1
adta2
ad4te
ad4tr
2adu
2a1e
ae2b
ae2c
ae2d
a2ek
a2ela
a2ele
ae2o3
ae2p
ae1r
3a2er2o1
ae2s
ae4sc
aes5t
a2et
a2ew
ae2x
af1a
a2fak
a2fan
a3far
af4at
a2fau
2afe
a2f1ec
a2fent
af1erl
a2fex
af2fei
af2f3l
af4flu
2afi
2af3l
afo1s
a2fö
af3ra
af3rä
af3re
af3rö
af3s2a
af2sp
2aft
af2t1a
af2tei
af4t3erl
af2t1o
af2t3r
af4t5re
af2tur
a2f3ur
a1g
2aga
ag1ab
ag1a2d
ag1ar
ag1au
ag2di
ag2du
2age.
age1i
age4na
age4neb
a2gent
a4gentu
ag2er
age4ral
2ages
age2sa
age4sel
age4si
age2s3p
ag3esse
age4s3ti
ag3gl
3aggr
3a2git
2a2gl
ag6la
a4glö
ag2n
ag4ne.
ag4nu
a2g3re
a2g3ri
ag4ro
agsa2
ag3s2ah
ag4sam
ag4set
ags3p
ag4spo
ag3sta
ag3ste
ags4toc
2agt
ag2th
a2gund
2ah.
2a1ha
ah4at
2a1he
ahe1in
a2h1erh
ahe1s
a1h2i
ahin3
ahl3a2
ah4l1ei
ah4l3erh
ah2lö
ahl3sz
ah4n1a
ahner4e
ahnt2
1ahor
ah1os
a2h3ö
ahr1a
ah3re
ahre4s3
ah3ri
ahrta4
ahr6tri
2ahs
ah2ta
aht3h
ah4t5r
aht3s
a1hu
ah1w
a1hy
ai3a
aian3
aid2s
ai1e2
aien3
aif4
ai1fr
ai3g4
a3ik.
ai3ke
ai3k4r
a2il
ai2lo
aim2o
ain4a
a1ind
ain4e
a1ing
ain3sp
2ais
ai2sa
a3isch.
ai3s2e
ait4
a3iv.
a3ivl
a3ivs
a1j
aje2
ajekt4o
2ak.
1a2k4ad
2akal
2a3kam
2akar
ak4at
1a2kaz
2akb
2akc
2akd
2a1ke
a2kef
aken2n
a2keu
2a1ki
2ak3l
ak4li
4ako
2a1kr
4akra
ak3rau
3akro
2aks
ak3sh
2akta
ak5tan
2aktb
2aktik
ak2t3r
ak5t4ri
2aktsi
2aktst
2a1ku
a2kun
2a3kü
1akz
a1la
2ala.
al1ab
al3abs
ala5ch2
al1af
ala2g
al1age
a3lal
al1am
al3ame
alami5
al3amp
al1ana
a2l1ang
al1ans
al1anz
a2lar
a3lar.
a3lare
al2arm
al3arr
ala4s
al1asi
al1ass
2alat
al1au
al3aug
a1lä
al1äm
alb3ein
al4berh
al4b3erw
al2b1l
alb3li
al2boh
al2br
alb3ru
alb3s
al2dä
al2dr
alds2t
2ale
ale4a
3a2l1e2b
3a4l1ef
a4l1eh
a2l1ei
a4lein
a2l1el
alen1
al3ends
a2leng
a3lentf
ale2p
al1epo
al1erf
a2l1erh
al3erl
3alerm
a2l1ert
3alerz
a2l1esk
ale4t
al1eta
al1eth
a2l1eu
a4leur
3a2lex
alf4r
3algi
al2gli
2ali
ali4ene
ali4nal
al1ins
a2linv
alk1ar
al2kne
1alkoh
alk3s2
alks4t
al2l1a2b
al2l3a4r
al2l1au
al3lend
all5erfa
al3les
1allgä
alli5er.
alli7ers.
al2lob
al4m3ast
3almb
2alo
a2l1o2b
3a2loe
alo2ga
al1ope
al1orc
a2l1ö
al3öf
al2ös
3alpe.
1alph
al3skl
al5s6terb
al3sun
al4tak
al3tam
al3tar
alt3eig
al4t3erf
al3ti
alt1op
al2tri
alt3ric
al2tro
alt2se
alt4stü
a1lu
al2uf
a2lum
al1umb
al1ur
4aly
alzer4z
al2zw
2am.
2am2a
amab4
amad2
ama3g
2amä
2am4e
4ame.
a2meb
ame2n1
amer2a
am5erf
a2meri
ame3ru
a4mesh
a3met
a2mew
2amf
a3mi.
a3mie
2a3mir
a3mis
ami3ta
ami3ti
2amk
2aml
4amm.
2ammal
am2mar
am2mei
am2min
2amml
2ammt
ammu2
a2mö
amp2fa2
am3pr
2am2s
am3sa
am4schl
am3str
1amt.
am2t1a
am2t1ä
am4tel
2amtem
am4t3ern
am4tö
am2t3r
am4tre
am2tu
2amu
2ana.
2anab
ana3c
anadi3
a3nak
an1alg
ana4lin
2anam
2anan
2ana1s4
an4at
an1äs
1anb
2anbu
an3ch
2and.
3an3d2ac
an4d3ei
ande2s
an2dex
an4drau
an2d3rü
and4sas
and6spas
and3ste
and2su
2andu
and1ur
2ane
an3e2c
a3nee
an2ei.
an3eif
an1e4k
3a4n1erb
an1eth
1anf
2anfi
an3f2u
4ang.
an2g1ar
3angeb
an2g1ei
an4g3erf
an4g3erl
an4gerw
an4g3erz
2angf
2angh
2angie
ang1l
an2gla
2ango
ang1r
an4g3ra
4angs.
ang4s3po
1anh
2a3ni
an2i3d
ani3els
ani5ers.
3a4nim
a4nins
2anj
2ank.
an2k1an
3ankä
an2kei
an3kl
an4klö
an2klu
an2k3no
ank1r
ank3ra
ank3rä
ankt4
1anl
1anmu
2ann
3an3na
ann2ab
3annä
an3n2e
ann4sto
an1od
a3nol
a2n1or
a3nos
2a1nö
2anpr
1anr
1an3s2ä
1ansc
ans2en
an2seu
2ansk
an3skr
an3s1pa
1anspr
an3s2z
2ant.
an2t3a4r
1antá
1antei
3antenn
an3t4he
1anthr
an3ti
2anto
1antr
ant3rin
an2tro
1antw
2a1nu
anu3s
a1nü
1anw
2anwet
2anzb
1anzei
2anzg
an2z1i4n
2anzs
1anzü
2anzw
an2zwa
an2zwi
2ao
ao1i
a1op
a1or
a1os3
ao3t2
a3ot.
a1ö
a1p
2ap.
2apa
2ape
a2pef
a3pel
a2pé
a2pf
a3p2fa
a3pfl
a3phä
a2ph3t
2ap3l
ap2n
a2pot
ap2pf
3appl
ap3pu
2apr
3apri
2a3pu
2aq
2ar.
a1ra
a3ra.
ar2ab
ar3abt
ara3d2
a2r3al
a3rali
2aran
a2r1ang
a2r1ans
a2r1anz
a2r3app
2a2rar
a2r1au
a1rä
1arb
2arb.
4arba
ar2bau
ar2bec
2arbek
2arben
4arbi
ar2bl
2arbr
ar2bre
2arbs2
2arbt
2arbu
ar2b3un
1ar1c
ar2dro
2are
a2rea
ar1eff
a4reg
a2reh
ar1ehr
a2rein
a4rek
4arem
a3ren
4aren.
aren4se
are3r2a
ar2erf
a2r1erh
a2reri
are3u
ar2ew
2arf
ar2fä
arf1r
ar2f3ra
ar2gl
ar2gn
ar3g4r
2arh
2ari
ar2ia
ari3e4n
ari3erd
ari3erg
ar1im
arin3it
arin5s4
ar1int
a3riu
ar2kal
ark3amt
ar2k1ar
ark3aue
ar2kl
ar4k3lag
ar2kor
ar4k3ri
ark3sa
ark3she
ark4tre
ar2les
2arma
ar3m2ä
ar3m2or
ar2nan
arn2e
2a1ro
ar1ob
a2r1o2d
a2r1op
a2ror
2arp
2arr
ar2r3ad
arre4n
ar2rh
arr3he
2arsa
ar4schl
arse3
ar3s2h
2arsi
ar2st
ar3sta
ar3t2e
ar2the
ar3ti
artin2
2arto
ar4t3ram
art3re
2arts
2artuc
2aru
ar1uh
ar1um
a2rü
2arv
arwa2
2ary
ar2zä
2arze
1arzt
ar2z1w
as1ala
as3au
a2s1ä
a2sca
a4schec
a3schi
asch1l
a2schm
a3schu
4as2e
a2seb
a2s3e2m
a3s4es
4ash
a3s2hi
asin2g
4asis
aska3s
a3skop
a2s1o2f
as1or
a2sö
a2s1p
as2ph
as2pi
as2po
a3spu
as3s2a
as3s2e
as4s3ei
as3s2i
as2s1p
as2st
ass3ti
as3str
as3stu
2as3ta
a1s4tas
as4tau
as3te
as2th
as3ti
as3to
as4tof
2astr
as4trau
ast3räu
as6t3re
a2sü
aswa2s
3a2syl
a1ß
aße2
aßen3
2a1t
ata1
at1ab
at2af
at4ag
a2t1akt
ata3l
a3tam
at1apf
at1au
a2taus
a2t1ä
at2c
a2teb
a3tec
ateien4
at1eig
a2teli
at2en
a2tep
ater3s2
ate2ru
at2h
at3ha
4athe1
3athl
4a3ti
atil4s
ati2st
3atm
4atmus
ato4man
4ator
a2t1ort
at1ö
4atr
atra4t
at3rä
at3re
at3rom
at3rü
at2sa
at4schn
at2se
at4set
at2si
at2so
at2s1p
at3ta
3attac
at4tak
att3ang
at4tau
at2tä
at2tei
at3t4hä
at2t3rä
att3s
a3tub
atu2n
a3tü
atz1er
at4zerk
at4zerw
at2z1in
at2zo
atz3t2
at2z1w
a2u
2au.
2au1a2
2aub
au2bab
aube4n
au2bli
au2blo
4auc
auch3ta
au2dr
2aue
aue2b
au2ere
au5erein
aue2s
au2fa
auf1an
2aufe.
2aufeh
auf1er
au4ferk
auff4
3aufn
auft2
2auft.
2aug
4augeh
4au1i
au2is
2auj
aule2s
au3lü
2aum
au2mal
aum2ei
au2m1e4r1
aum3eri
au2m1o
aum3p2
aum3s6
4aun
au3n4a
aun2e
au4nei
au2nio
au1nu
a4unz
au1o
2aup2
aup4ter
2au3r2
au2s1ah
ausan8ne.
au2sau
4ausc
au4schm
1ausd
2ausen
aus3erp
au4s3erw
3ausf
1ausg
1ausl
au2so
au2spr
1ausr
3aussag
auss2e
aus4se.
auss2t
2auste
aust2o
aus5tri
1ausü
1ausz
2aut.
au2t1äu
2aute
au4ten4g
au4t3erh
1auto
2auts
2auu
2auw
2aux
2auz
auz2w
2a1ü
2a1v
a3v4a
ava3t4
4avi
a2vr
2a1w
awi3e
a1x
ax4am
ax2e
2a1ya
a1yeu
ays4
aysi1
ay3t
2a1z
a3z2a
aza3d
az2o
az2u
ä1a
äand4
ä1b
ä2b3l
äb2s
ä1che
äche1e
ä1chi
äch3l
ä2chr
äch2sp
äch4st
ä1chu
ä1ck
ä3ck2e
ä1d
ä2da
ä2d1ia
ä2dr
äd2s
2ä1e
äf2e
äfe4n
äf2f3l
äf3l
äf3r
äf2s
äft4s3
ä1g
äge1i
äge2ra
äge3s
ä2g3l
äg2n
ä2g3r
äg4ra
äg3str
1ä2gy
äh1a
2ä3he
ä3hi
ähl1a
äh3l2e
äh4l3e4be
2ähm
äh3na
äh3ne
1ähnl
2ähr
äh3ri
2ähs
2äh3t
ä1hu
äh1w
ä1im
ä1is.
ä3isch.
ä1isk
ä1j
ä1k
ä2k3l
ä2k3r
ä1la
älbe2
äl2bl
2äle
äl2l1a
äl2p3
äl4schl
ä1lu
ämi3en
2äml
2ämp
äm2s
ämt2e
2än.
än5de
än2dr
2äne
äne2n1
äne1s
än2f5
änft2
2änge
2än2g3l
än2gr
äng3se
2ä3ni
änk2e
än2k3l
än2kr
änk2s
änn4e2
äno3
2äns
än2s1c
äns2e
änse3h
2änz
ä1on
ä1pa
äp2pl
äp2pr
äp2s1c
äp4st
1äq
ä2r3a2
är4af
är1ä
är2b3le
är1c
4äre
ä2r1ei
äre2n
ä2r1ene
är2gr
är1int
är2k3l
ärk2s
är4ment
ärm2s
är1o2
ä1rö
ärse2
är4si
är2st
ärt4e
är2th
ärt2s3
ä2rü
är2zw
ä5s4e
äse3g2
äser4ei
äse4ren
äser2i
äse3t
äskop2
äskopf3
ä3s2kr
ä2s1p
äs6s1c
äss2e
äs4s3erk
äs2s3t
ä4s3t2
äs4tr
ä3su
ä1ß
äß1erk
ä2t1a2
ä3te
äte1i
ätein2
äte2n
ät2h
ät1ob
ä2t3r
ät2sa
ät2sä
ät4schl
ät4schr
ät2s1i
äts3l
ät2s1p
ät2s3t
ät2tei
ät4tr
ät2zw
äu2b3l
äu2br
äu1c
äude3
äu3el
ä2uf
äuf2e
1äug
äug3l
4äul
2äum
äu2ma
äum4s5
ä2un
äun2e
äu1nu
2äur
2ä3us.
äu4schm
äu3se
ä3usg
ä3usk
ä3usn
äu2sp
äus2s1c
1äuß
äu2tr
4ä1v
1äx
ä1z
â1t
á1n
ba2bl
2babs
bach5t4e
backs4
b1a2dr
2b1af
3bah
bah2nu
bahr2e
bais2
ba2ka
ba2k1er
ba2k1i
bak1l
bak1r
ba2kra
3bal
bal2a
bal4l3eh
bal6lerg
2b3am
ba2me
ban2a
3b2and
ban2dr
ba3n2e
b1ang
ban3gl
ban2k1a
ban4kl
ban2kr
2banl
2b1ans
ban3t
b1anz
bar3b
bar3de
ba2rei
bar2en
bar3ins
bar3n
bar3zw
3bas
ba3s2a
ba2sc
ba2st
ba4t3ent
bauer4l
bauer4s
bau3g
bau1s
bau3s2k
bau3sp
baus4t
ba1yo
3b2ä1c
b2är
b2äs
4b1b
b3be
bben3
bbens2
bbe4p
bb3ler
bb2lö
bbru2c
bb2s
bbu1
2b1c
2b3d4
bde1s
1be.
3bea
be3an
be3ar
3beb
b2ebe
1be1c
be2del
bedi4
be1eh
be1erl
be1eta
3bef4
be3g2
2b1eier
bei1f4
bei4ge.
beik4
beil2
bei3la
2b1eime
b2ein
be1ind
be1in2h
bei3sc
beis2e
bei1s4t
beit2s
3bek
3bel
be3las
bel3d
be3lec
be3lei
be2l1en
be2let
be3li
bel3la
be2l3ö
bel3sz
bel3t4
1bem
1ben.
ben3ar
be4nas
be4nä
ben3dor
be3nei
3beng
be3n2i
ben3n
ben2se
ben4spa
ben4spr
benst4
ben2su
2bentb
b2enti
ben5t4r
b1ents
2bentw
ben3un
ben3z2
be1o
be1ra
be2rab
be2ran
berb2
berd4
ber4ei.
be4r3eiw
be4rerk
bere4s
ber6gan.
ber4in.
ber3iss
ber3na
b1ernt
be1rop
ber3st4a
be3rum
ber2zö
3be1s
bes2a
be2s1er
be3slo
bes2po
bess4e
b3esst.
bes3sz
be6stein
be4s3tol
best4r
be3s4ze
3bet
be2tap
be3tha
be1ur
3b2ew
2b1ex
1bez
4b5f4
bfal2
2b1g2
bge3
bges4
2b5h2
bhut2
1bi
bi3ak
bib2
bibe2
bien3s
bie2s
bik2a
bi2ke.
bi2kes
bil2a
bi2lau
2b1illu
bi2lu
2b1inb
bin2e
2b1inf
bin3gl
2b1inh
2b1int
bi2o1
bio3d
bi3on
biri1
bi3se
b1iso
bi2sol
bi2sp
bis2s1c
bi2s5t
b2it.
b2it2a
b2ite
bi3ti
bi2tu
b2i3tus
biz2
4b1j
bjek4to
2b1k4
bl2
2bl.
bla3b4
b3lad
b5lag
b2lanc
3blat
b2latt
2b3law
b2läse
b2le
3blea
